src/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! !!!The Moksha morphophonological/twolc rules file 


Alphabet !!≈!!The base @CODE@
!! {{{
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я !!= @CODE@
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я !!= @CODE@
!! }}}

%{ъØ%}:0	
!! This will represent schwa in first syllable

!! 2016-03-12
%^А2О:0		!!= @CODE@ used with final а in пула 


%{еэ%}:е
%{еэ%}:э

!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
!Ь2:ь !
Ь2:0 !
 %{ЬØ%}:0	!!= @CODE@ after imperative Sg2
! verbal stem consonant that appear in PretI Sg3
!Т1:0 !
 %{ВИУ%}:в       !!= @CODE@ lative
 %{ВИУ%}:и
 %{ВИУ%}:у

! derivational suffix protovowel with "o" and "a" 
!realisation  in deverbal noun ending
А1:а !


! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
А2:я !А2
 %{АЯ%}:я !!= @CODE@ А2 in панемс:панян
!Ы2:и !
Ы2:ы !
 %{ИЫЙ%}:й	!!= @CODE@ phasing out Ы2, eg кундамс:кундай
 %{ИЫЙ%}:ы	!!= @CODE@ phasing out Ы2, eg кандомс:канды
 %{ИЫЙ%}:и	!!= @CODE@ phasing out Ы2, eg панемс:пани

! onset vowel  for morphemes requiring a preceding vowel
 %{ЕОØ%}:е	!!= @CODE@ morpheme onset linking vowel from %^О1
 %{ЕОØ%}:о	!!= @CODE@ morpheme onset linking vowel from %^О1
 %{ЕОØ%}:0	!!= @CODE@ morpheme onset linking vowel from %^О1 also пинге


! derivational suffix protovowel  "mo" and "me"


! пула, офта, пинге
!О2:а
!О2:о
!О2:е
%{АЕØ%}:а	!!= @CODE@  ConNeg with ашень, тят, афоль
%{АЕØ%}:е
%{АЕØ%}:0

%{АО%}:а	!!= @CODE@  пула stem
%{АО%}:о	!!= @CODE@  пула stem
%{АОØ%}:а	!!= @CODE@  офта stem
%{АОØ%}:о	!!= @CODE@  офта stem
%{АОØ%}:0	!!= @CODE@  офта stem

 %{ЕО%}:е	!!= @CODE@ сельме
 %{ЕО%}:о	!!= @CODE@ 

 %{ЕØ%}:е	!!= @CODE@ кече
 %{ЕØ%}:0	!!= @CODE@ 

%{АЕ%}:е
%{АЕ%}:а	!!= @CODE@ prolative

! devoicing
Х1:х
!Х1:0
 %{Х%}:0	!!= @CODE@ This usually precedes the plural marker

%{DIM%}:н		!!= @CODE@ This will be for diminutive initial consonant

! clitic proto consonant
%{гк%}:г !
%{гк%}:к !
%{гк%}:0 !



! Prolative Ga
%{вгк%}:г !
%{вгк%}:к !
%{вгк%}:в !


! Imperative clitic proto consonant
Г4:г !
Г4:к !
Г4:0 !
!Replace these with "G1" but apply stem final "K4" to
!




! imperative suffix
К1:к !
!К1:т 
!
%{КТ%}:т	!!= @CODE@ used in imperative and connegative
%{КТ%}:к
! connegative suffix rendering vowel
! панемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2
!!€ пань%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пат0%>0тье0
К3:0 !

! Stem final on Imperative Verbs
!!К4:0 !



!! in ped realized as hard sign

!! !!TRIGGERS
%^RmVow:0 !!= * @CODE@ for removing vowels 
%^Ь2ZERO:0	!!= @CODE@ removes soft sign before vowel or other combination
%^Ъ2PED:0	!!= @CODE@ brings out hard sign, which is
!! otherwise automatically removed %{ъØ%} 
%^Е2О:0		!!= @CODE@ Change stem-final vowel сембе:сембось
%^Е2А:0		!!= @CODE@ Change stem-final vowel мельге:мельганза
%^Я2А:0		!!= @CODE@ Change stem-final vowel рьвя:рьванц
%^А2Е:0		!!= @CODE@ Change stem-final vowel мокша:мокшесь
%^Devoice:0	!!= @CODE@ for devoicing изь:исть
%^PXSG1:0		!!= @CODE@ кядне, ярмаконе не vs %{ЕОØ%}не

TLoss:0
SLoss:0
KLoss:0
VLoss:0
WLoss:0
NoVLoss:0

 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

 %- !!= * {{@CODE@}} – Hyphen with constructions like "-bdi"
 %> !!= * {{@CODE@}} – conjugation/declension morpheme boundary suffix
 »  !!= * {{@CODE@}} – derivation morpheme boundary suffix
 #  !!= * {{@CODE@}} – word boundary 

;


Sets !!≈ !!The @CODE@

!! {{{
Vows = а о у ы э я ё ю и е ;                                            !!= @CODE@
verbStemVows = а о э я ё е ;                                            !!= @CODE@
verbStemVowStrong = а о э я ё е ;                                       !!= @CODE@
noGlideVow = а о у ы э ;                                                !!= @CODE@
glideVow = я ё ю и е ;                                                  !!= @CODE@
BTV = а о у я ё ю ;                                !!= @CODE@ ! Back Trigger Vowels
FTV = ы и е э ;                                   !!= @CODE@ ! Front Trigger Vowels

Cns = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;                       !!= @CODE@
CnsAndSoft = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ;                       !!= @CODE@
NPC = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ; ! Nonpalatal Consonants !!= @CODE@
CnsVoiced = б в г д ж з й л м н р ;                                     !!= @CODE@
CnsVoicedDent = д з л н р ;                                             !!= @CODE@
CnsVoicedNonDent = б в г ж й м ;                                        !!= @CODE@
CnsVoiceless = к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;                                    !!= @CODE@
CnsVoicelessDent = с т ц ;                                              !!= @CODE@
CnsVoicelessNonDent = к п ф х ч ш щ ;                                   !!= @CODE@
CnsNonDent = б в г ж к м п ф х ч ш щ ;                                  !!= @CODE@
CnsDent = д з л н р с т ц  ;                                            !!= @CODE@
CnsDentNoL = д з н р с т ц  ;                                           !!= @CODE@

Letters = Vows Cns ь ъ ;                                                !!= @CODE@
!! }}}

Definitions !!≈ !!The @CODE@

CnsNotCliticVok = [ [Cns - в] | в [ Vws - о ] | в о [ Cns - к] ] ;

! Front Trigger Consonants (less ль)
FTC = [ й: | д ь: | з ь: | н ь: | р ь: | с ь: | т ь: | ц ь: ] ;

! All Consonants
AC = [ FTC | л ь | NPC ] ;

! Left Front Context Soft
LFCS = [ [ FTV AC* [ Cns - CnsDent ] ] | FTV AC* FTC | [ BTV FTC [ AC* [ Cns - CnsDent ] ]* ] ] ;

! Left Front Context Hard
LFCH =[ [ :FTV AC* CnsDent ] | [ BTV FTC [ AC* CnsDent ]+ ] | [ BTV л ь [ к с ] ] ] ;

! Left Back Context
LBC = [ [ BTV ( %> ) NPC:+ ] | [ BTV л ь [[ NPC* NPC ] - [ :* к с ] ] ] ] ;

PossX = [ м | н %{ЬØ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}: | н т %{ЬØ%}:  | н к | с т ] ;

! Suffix-Initial Variable Vowel
SIVV = [ PossX | в | н е н ь | т е н ь | т е т ь  | н т е н ь | л ь | л и | к с | ш к а | с | %{ЕОØ%}: н з %{АО%}: | т ь | н т ь: | н ь: | м А1: | м г а | т с ь | т с т ь | з ь: ] ;


Back =  :* [SubseqBackHarm \[ :FTV | :й | :ь ]* ( л ь ) [NPC]]  ;





Rules !!≈ !!The @CODE@

!!!Vowel changes

!Changes in the stem vowels before "10", "20", "30" and "60"
"verbStemVowStrong:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns | Vows ] _  %> [%{АЯ%}:я|%{АЯ%}:а [ н | т ]] ;
!!2013-10-16!!                   Cns  _ К4:0 %>  %{ИЫЙ%}: ;
          where Vx in (а э ы я ё ю)
                Vy in (0 0 0 0 0 0) matched ;
!!цёра+N+Sg+Nom+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: __man/mies__
!!€ цёра%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ цёр0%>ан

"у:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 Vx:Vy <=> :Vows Cns+ _  %> [%{АЯ%}:я|%{АЯ%}:а [ н | т ]] ;
           where Vx in (и у)
                 Vy in (0 0) matched ;

!! тумс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1
!!$ #ту%>%{АЯ%}н
!!$ #т0%>ан
!!€ #ту%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ #ту%>ян
!
!Vowels in Nouns and Adjectives 
!2006-12-02
!"YI3:y"
!И3:ь <=>  CnsDent  _ [%>  [%{гк%}:г|%{гк%}:к|%{вгк%}:г|%{вгк%}:к|с [%> |# ] | с (т) %{АО%}: |:CnsNonDent]| #] ;
!      #   :* л  _ [%> (в:0) :Cns|#] ;
!

! ScSg3 verb
"о:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
о:0 <=>  _ %>  %{ИЫЙ%}: ;
[ Cns | Vows ] _  %> [%{АЯ%}:я|%{АЯ%}:а [ н | т ]] ;

! Deverbal noun in ОмА
"A1:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
А1:о <=>  [ а |я ] %>  м  _ ;

!!2013-10-16!"%{ИЫЙ%}:yi"
!!2013-10-16!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!!2013-10-16!%{ИЫЙ%}:и <=> [ я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | ю:0 | ь:0 | й:0 | CnsNonDent (noGlideVow:0)]  %> _ ;

"%{ИЫЙ%}:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{ИЫЙ%}:й <=> [ я | а | у | и | ю]  %> _ [ # | %- | » | %> в о к | ( %> ) х т  ь | %> [с|д|т] | х т е | н е | т ь ] ;
!!€ стя%>%{ИЫЙ%}%>сь
!!€ стя%>й%>сь
!! мумс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: __find/löytää__
!!€ му%>%{ИЫЙ%}хтень
!!€ му%>йхтень

"%{ИЫЙ%}:ы"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ИЫЙ%}:ы <=> CnsDent (о:) %> _  ;

"%{ИЫЙ%}:и"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ИЫЙ%}:и <=> [ CnsNonDent (о:) | CnsDent ь: | е: | й: ] %> _  ;


"%{ИЫЙ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{ИЫЙ%}:0 <=> [ я | а ]  %> _ [ й: ] ;
!! араламс+V+Der/NomAg+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: __protect/puolustaa__
!!€ арала%>%{ИЫЙ%}й%>%{ЕОØ%}ц
!!€ арала%>0й%>ец

"%{ЕОØ%}:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕОØ%}:о <=> [ б | в | г | к | м | п | ф | х ] (%^PXSG1:) %> _  [Cns|%{вгк%}:] ;
 [ д | с | т | ц ] (%^PXSG1:) %> _  Cns ;
 [з |л|н|р ] (%^PXSG1:) %> _ [Cns - [к|с]] ;
  [з|л|н|р ] %> _ [с ь к |с т ] ;
  Cns _ (%^PXSG1:) %> [Cns | %{ЕОØ%}:] ;
!! район+N+SP+Gen+Indef:
!!€ район%>%{ЕОØ%}нь
!!€ район%>онь


"%{ЕОØ%}:е LEFT"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕОØ%}:е <=
   [ ж | ч | ш | щ ] (%^PXSG1:) %> _  [Cns|%{вгк%}:] ;
 [ д | с | т | ц ] ь: (%^PXSG1:) %> _  [Cns|%{вгк%}:] ;
 [з | л|н|р ] ь: (%^PXSG1:) %> _ [Cns - [ к|с]] ;
 [з |л|н|р ] ь: %> _ [с ь к |с т ] ;
   Cns (ь:) _ # ;
!!€ пинг%{ЕОØ%}#
!!€ пинге#
!!€ эрьхк%{ЕО0%}#
!!€ эрьхке0
   й: %> _ з [%> | е | а:]  ;
!!€ тий%>%{ЕОØ%}за
!!€ ти0%>еза
!! кой+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add:
!!€ кой%>%{ЕОØ%}з%>%{ЕОØ%}н%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ ко0%>ез%>он%>га
!!$ кой%>%{ЕОØ%}з%>%{ЕОØ%}н%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!$ ко0%>0з%>он%>га

"%{ЕОØ%}:е RIGHT"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕОØ%}:е =>
   [ ж | ч | ш | щ ] (%^PXSG1:) %> _  [Cns|%{вгк%}:] ;
 [ д | с | т | ц ] ь: (%^PXSG1:) %> _  [Cns|%{вгк%}:] ;
 [з | л|н|р ] ь: (%^PXSG1:) %> _ [Cns - [ к|с]] ;
 [з |л|н|р ] ь: %> _ [с ь к |с т ] ;
!!€ тий%>%{ЕОØ%}за
!!€ ти0%>еза
   Cns (ь:) _ # ;
!!€ пинг%{ЕОØ%}#
!!€ пинге#
!!€ эрьхк%{ЕО0%}#
!!€ эрьхке0
   й: (%^PXSG1:) %> _ [Cns - [ к|с]] ;
!! вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1 __oil,butter/voi__
!!€ вай%>%{ЕОØ%}зе
!!€ ва0%>езе
   й: %> _ з %>  ;
!   й: %> _ [Cns - [ к|с|ц|з]] ;

"%{ЕОØ%}:0 LEFT"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕОØ%}:0 <=  [Vows|%^Я2А:|%{АО%}:|%{АОØ%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕО%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:] (%^Е2А:) %> _ Cns ;
!  [Vows|%{АО%}:|%{АОØ%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕО%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:] (%^Е2А:) %> _ Cns ;
        [з|й|л|н|р] (ь:) %> _  [к с | с [#| %-|%>]] ;
          Cns (ь:) _ %^RmVow: ;

"%{ЕОØ%}:0 RIGHT"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕОØ%}:0 =>  [Vows|%^Я2А:|%{АО%}:|%{АОØ%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕО%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:] (%^Е2А:) %> _ Cns ;
!  [Vows|%{АО%}:|%{АОØ%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕО%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:] (%^Е2А:) %> _ Cns ;
        [з|й|л|н|р] (ь:) %> _  [к с | с [#| %-|%>]] ;
          Cns (ь:) _ %^RmVow: ;
   й: (%^PXSG1:) %> _ [Cns - [ к|с]] ;
!! вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1 __oil,butter/voi__
!!€ вай%>%{ЕОØ%}зе
!!€ вай%>0зе

"%{АОØ%}:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{АОØ%}:о <=>
        Cns _ %> ;
        Cns _ %^PXSG1: %> н ;
![ б | в | г | к | м | п | ф | х ] %> _  [Cns|%{вгк%}:] ;
! [ д | с | т | ц ] %> _  Cns ;
! [з |л|н|р ] %> _ [Cns - [к|с]] ;
!  [з|л|н|р ] %> _ [с ь к |с т ] ;


"%{АОØ%}:а"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{АОØ%}:а <=>
   Cns  _ [# | %- ] ;
!!€ панг%{АОØ%}#
!!€ панга#
!   [ ж | ч | ш | щ ] %> _  Cns ;
!   й: %> _ [Cns - [ к|с|ц|з]] ;
! [ д | с | т | ц ] ь: %> _  Cns ;
! [з | л|н|р ] ь: %> _ [Cns - [ к|с]] ;
! [з |л|н|р ] ь: %> _ [с ь к |с т ] ;
!!€ тий%>%{ЕОØ%}за
!!€ ти0%>еза

"%{АОØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{АОØ%}:0 <=>
          Cns: _ %^RmVow: ;
!! офта+N+Sg+Nom+Def __bear/ohto, karhu__
!!€ офт%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>сь
!!€ офт00%>сь
!! кодама+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+Indef:
!!€ кодам%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кодап00%>0т0

![Vows|%{АО%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕО%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:]  %> _ Cns ;
!        [з|й|л|н|р] (ь:) %> _  [к с | с [#| %-|%>]] ;

"%{АО%}:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{АО%}:о <=>
        Cns _ %> [%{ЕОØ%}:|%{DIM%}:|%{Х%}: т|Cns] ;
!! пула+N+Sg+Nom+Def: __tail__
!!€ пул%{АО%}%>сь
!!€ пуло%>сь
!!€ пул%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}
!!€ пуло%>0нза


"%{АО%}:а"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{АО%}:а <=>
   Cns  _ [ # | %-] ;
!!€ пул%{АО%}#
!!€ пула#

"Vx:0 %{АО%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
Vx:0 <=>
        Cns _ %> %{АЯ%}:  ;
	where Vx in (%{АО%} %{ЕО%}) ;
!! пря+N+SP+Ine+Der/Cop+Prs+ScSg1 __top, head/pää__
!!€ пря%>с%{АО%}%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ пря%>с0%>ан


"%{ЕО%}:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕО%}:е <=>  _ [#| %- ] ;
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}#
!!€ сельме#
      [ ш|ч] %> _ %> ш к а ;

"%{ЕО%}:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕО%}:о <=>  [Cns - [ ш|ч|ж]]  _ %> [%{ЕОØ%}:| Cns:|:Cns|%{вгк%}:| %{Х%}:] ;
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нь
!!€ сельмо%>0нь
       [с|ц] %> _ %> ш к а ;
  [Cns - [ ш|ч|ж]]  _ %^PXSG1: %> н е ;
!! сельме+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: __my eyes/silmäni
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}%^PXSG1%>не
!!€ сельмо0%>не
      к %> _ %{DIM%}: я ;
!! байдек+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: __staff/sauva__
!!€ байдек%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я
!!€ байдек%>оня

"%{ЕØ%}:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕØ%}:е  <=>  _ [%> |# | %- ] ; 
